Massachusetts, session 194th, H4135.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 503 of the acts of 1952, as most recently amended by 
section 1 of chapter 94 of the acts of 2019, is hereby further amended by striking out the first 
sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- The election of assessors shall 
continue as presently provided.  
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of section 15 of said chapter 503, as most recently amended 
by section 2 of said chapter 94, is hereby further amended by striking out the first paragraph and 
inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- 
The town manager shall supervise and direct the administration of all departments, 
commissions, boards and offices, except the select board, the school committee, moderator, 
board of assessors, registrars of voters, election officers, boards of appeal, the finance committee, 
the capital budget committee and the personnel review and appeals board. 

of 3 12  SECTION 3. The second paragraph of subsection (c) of said section 15 of said chapter 
503, as most recently amended by section 4 of said chapter 94, is hereby further amended by 
striking out the first and second sentences and inserting in place thereof the following 2 
sentences:-  The town manager shall appoint upon merit and fitness alone the town's comptroller, 
who shall also be vested with the authorities of a town accountant, the town treasurer and 
collector, and the town clerk, subject to the approval of the select board. Appointment of the 
town clerk, comptroller and the town treasurer and collector shall become effective upon the 
approval of the select board. 
SECTION 4. The third paragraph of said subsection (c) of said section 15 of said chapter 
503, as most recently amended by section 6 of said chapter 94, is hereby further amended by 
striking out the first and second sentences and inserting in place thereof the following 2 
sentences:-  The town clerk, comptroller or the town treasurer and collector may be removed by 
the town manager subject to the approval of the select board. Removal of the town clerk, 
comptroller or the town treasurer and collector shall become effective upon approval of the select 
board. 
SECTION 5. Said subsection (c) of said section 15 of said chapter 503, as most recently 
amended by section 7 of said chapter 94, is hereby further amended by striking out the fourth 
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- 
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection to the contrary, the town clerk, 
comptroller and the town treasurer and collector shall be authorized to report directly to the 
chairperson of the select board, or any member of the board, on any matter in the town at any 
time, without the necessity of prior approval from the town manager or any other official. 

of 3 34  SECTION 6. Upon the effective date of this act, the incumbent elected to the office of 
town clerk shall continue to hold the office and to perform the duties thereof until the expiration 
of the term for which the individual was elected or until the individual otherwise vacates the 
office, whichever is sooner, at which time the elected office of town clerk shall be abolished and 
appointments to the position of town clerk shall be made in accordance with this act. 
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.